Massachusetts, session 194th, H3979.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. With respect to each qualifying parcel of real property classified as class
one, residential in the city of Melrose there shall be an exemption from the property tax in an
amount as provided for in section 3.
The exemption shall be applied to the domicile of the taxpayer only. For the purposes of
this act, “parcel” shall be a unit of real property as defined by the board of assessors of the city
under the deed for the property and shall include a condominium unit. The exemption provided
for herein shall be in addition to any and all other exemptions allowed by the General Laws.
SECTION 2. Real property shall qualify for the exemption pursuant to section 1 if all of
the following criteria are met: (1) the qualifying real property is owned and occupied by a person
whose prior year’s income would make the person eligible for the circuit breaker income tax
credit pursuant to subsection (k) of section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws; (2) the
of 3

qualifying real property is owned by a single applicant age 65 or older at the close of the
previous year or jointly by persons either of whom is age 65 or above at the close of the previous
year, if the joint applicant is 60 years of age or older; (3) the qualifying real property is owned
and occupied by the applicant or joint applicants as their domicile; (4) the applicant or at least 1
of the joint applicants has been domiciled and owned a home in the city of Melrose for at least
10 consecutive years before filing an application for the exemption; (5) the assessed value of the
domicile is no greater than the prior year’s maximum assessed value for qualification for the
circuit breaker income tax credit pursuant to said subsection (k) of said section 6 of said chapter
62, as adjusted annually by the department of revenue; and (6) the board of assessors has
approved the application.
SECTION 3. The exemption amount provided for in section 1 above shall be one
hundred percent of the circuit breaker income tax credit pursuant to subsection (k) of section 6 of
chapter 62 of the General Laws for which the applicant qualified in the previous year. The total
amount exempted by this act shall be allocated proportionally within the tax levy on all
residential taxpayers.
SECTION 4. A person who seeks to qualify for the exemption pursuant to section 1 shall,
before the deadline established by the board of assessors, file an application, on a form to be
adopted by the board of assessors, with the supporting documentation of the applicant’s income
and assets as described in the application. The application shall be filed each year for which the
applicant seeks the exemption. The board of assessors of the city of Melrose may deny an
application for an exemption pursuant to section 1 if they find the applicant has excessive assets
that place the applicant outside the category of intended recipients of the senior exemption
created by this act.
of 3

SECTION 5. No exemption shall be granted under this act until the department of
revenue certifies a residential tax rate for the applicable tax year where the total exemption
amount is raised by a burden shift within the residential tax levy.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage, and shall replace
Chapter 100 of the Acts of 2022. This act shall be repealed after 3 years of implementation of
this exemption.
of 3